Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2543
Abolishment or termination of provisions.

The county board of a county which creates a personnel policy board may, by a two-thirds majority, vote to abolish such board, terminate the position of the personnel officer, and revoke all rules and regulations.

Laws 1994, LB 212, § 10.